apertium-mal-eng_jan27/dev/njan.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- ഞാന്‍; ; 16 -->
    <pardef n="/ഞാന്‍__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>ഞാന്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>എന്നെ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>എന്റെ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>എനിക്ക്</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>എന്നില്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞാനാല്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞാനേ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>എന്നൊട്</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങള്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളെ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളുടെ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങള്‍കൂ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളില്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളാല്‍</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളേ</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ഞങ്ങളോടു</l><r>ഞാന്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="ഞാന്‍"><i></i><par n="/ഞാന്‍__prn"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
